Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.127

License suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The secretary shall immediately suspend the license of any person subject to this chapter who has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

[ 1997 c 58 s 830.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.